Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1130.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, the
Honorable Thomas J. Paolino may join Mariah Marie Paolino and Conner Joseph Gerlach in
marriage within the Town of Lincoln, Rhode Island on or about June 13, 2025. The Honorable
Thomas J. Paolino is hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage
pursuant to and in accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled
“Solemnization of Marriages.”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002982
========